Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 9 Amendment and Restatement of Articles of Incorporation of Electric Membership Corporations

46-3-360.
Right of electric membership corporation to amend articles of incorporation.

An electric membership corporation may amend its articles of incorporation from time to time in any and in as many respects as may be desired, so long as the amendment contains only such provisions as might lawfully be contained in original articles of incorporation at the time of making such amendment.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 14; Ga. L. 1957, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 5; Code 1933, § 34C-901, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Georgia Laws 1937, p. 644, contained two provisions which were designated as “Section 14,” one such provision appearing on page 653 and the other appearing on page 654. The provision appearing on page 653 is codified at §

46-3-340

and the provision appearing on page 654 is codified at this section and §

46-3-361

.

46-3-361.
Procedure to amend articles of incorporation generally.

Before the electric membership corporation has any members, amendments to the articles of incorporation may be made:

Before the organization meeting of the directors, by the incorporator or, if there is more than one incorporator, then by two-thirds of the incorporators; and

At or after the organization meeting of the directors named in the articles of incorporation, by two-thirds of the directors.

After the electric membership corporation has members, amendments to the articles of incorporation shall be made in the following manner:

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution setting forth the proposed amendment and directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting;

Written notice setting forth the proposed amendment or a summary of the changes to be effected thereby shall be given to each member of record entitled to vote thereon within the time and in the manner provided in Code Section 46-3-263 for the giving of notice of meetings of members. If the meeting is an annual meeting, the proposed amendment or such summary may be included in the notice of such annual meeting;

At such meeting a vote of the members shall be taken on the proposed amendment. The proposed amendment shall be adopted upon receiving the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Any number of amendments may be submitted to the members and may be voted upon by them at one meeting.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 14; Ga. L. 1957, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 5; Code 1933, § 34C-902, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

Code Commission notes.

Georgia Laws 1937, p. 644, contained two provisions which were designated as “Section 14,” one such provision appearing on page 653 and the other appearing on page 654. The provision appearing on page 653 is codified at §

46-3-340

and the provision appearing on page 654 is codified at §

46-3-360

and this section.

46-3-362.
Manner of execution of articles of amendment; contents of articles of amendment.

The articles of amendment, other than an amendment under subsection (b) of this Code section, shall be executed by the electric membership corporation as provided in Code Section 46-3-173 and shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

The amendment so adopted;

The date of the adoption of the amendment by the members; and

The member vote required to adopt the amendment, the number of members entitled to vote, and the number of members who voted for the amendment.

If the amendment is made by the incorporator or incorporators or directors before the electric membership corporation has any members, the articles of amendment shall be executed by the incorporator or incorporators or directors, as the case may be, and shall set forth:

The name of the electric membership corporation;

The amendment so adopted and the date of adoption; and

A statement that the amendment is made by the incorporator or incorporators or directors before the electric membership corporation has any members.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-903, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-363.
Obtaining of certificate from Secretary of State upon amendment of name of electric membership corporation; filing articles of amendment; issuance of certificate of amendment; forwarding of copy of certificate to superior court; rejection of articles of amendment; publication of notice.

If the purpose or one of the purposes of the articles of amendment is to change the corporate name, the electric membership corporation shall cause to be obtained from the Secretary of State a certificate which states that the proposed name is available in accordance with Code Section 46-3-220. Such certificate shall be issued upon application to reserve the use of the proposed name as provided in Code Section 46-3-221 and shall be valid for the period provided in that Code section, including any extension of such period granted by the Secretary of State. Upon the expiration of such period or any extension thereof, the certificate shall become void unless the amendment changing the corporate name shall have become effective within such time.

The electric membership corporation shall cause the original articles of amendment and two conformed copies of the articles to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174.

Together with the articles of amendment, the electric membership corporation shall cause to be delivered to the Secretary of State:

If subsection (a) of this Code section is applicable, the certificate issued by the Secretary of State reserving the proposed corporate name;

Payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-501;

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $16.00, payable to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located on the day of delivery of the articles of amendment to the Secretary of State, in payment of the cost of filing the articles of amendment in said county;

A letter addressed to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located or which is a newspaper of general circulation published within that county whose most recently published annual statement of ownership and circulation reflects a minimum of 60 percent paid circulation. This letter shall contain a notice to be published four times in the newspaper and shall be in substantially the following form:

Click to view

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $60.00 payable to the designated newspaper.

Upon delivery of the articles of amendment to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall affix thereon the hour, day, month, and year of delivery. Not later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery, the Secretary of State shall either issue a certificate of amendment in the manner provided in this Code section or reject the articles in the manner provided in this Code section.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of amendment appear to be in proper form for filing and are accompanied by the other items required by subsection (c) of this Code section, he shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174:

Issue a certificate of amendment which shall state that the articles of incorporation have been duly amended by the filing of articles of amendment in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees paid therefor, as provided by law, and attach the certificate to one conformed copy of the articles of amendment;

Return the certificate of amendment with the conformed copy of the articles of amendment attached thereto to the electric membership corporation or its representative. A copy of the certificate of amendment shall be attached to the original articles of amendment;

Forward a conformed copy of the articles of amendment with a copy of the certificate of amendment attached thereto, along with the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this Code section, to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located, within four business days after the articles of amendment have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; and

Mail the letter and the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraphs (4) and (5) of subsection (c) of this Code section, with the date inserted in the notice, to the designated newspaper within four business days after the articles of amendment have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

If the Secretary of State finds that the articles of amendment do not appear to be in proper form for filing or are not accompanied by the other items required by subsection (c) of this Code section, he shall reject the articles for filing and shall immediately notify the electric membership corporation or its representative of such rejection by mailing a notice no later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery of the articles of amendment for filing. Said notice shall specify the reason or reasons for rejection of the articles of amendment, and said articles and all accompanying materials shall be returned therewith.

The conformed copy of the articles of amendment, with a copy of the certificate of amendment attached thereto, as provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (e) of this Code section, shall be filed upon receipt by the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the conformed copy of the articles of amendment or failure on the part of the clerk of the superior court to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State.

The notice provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of this Code section shall be published within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the notice or failure on the part of the newspaper to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State.

(Name and address of the newspaper designated by the electric membership corporation) Dear Sirs: You are requested to publish, four times, a notice in the following form: “The Articles of Incorporation of (name of electric membership corporation) have been duly amended on , (month, day, and year to be inserted by the Secretary of State), by the issuance of a certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State, in accordance with the applicable provisions of Article 4 of Chapter 3 of Title 46, the ‘Georgia Electric Membership Corporation Act.”’ Enclosed is a (check, draft, or money order) in the amount of $60.00 in payment of the cost of publishing this notice. Very truly yours, (Name and address of the electric membership corporation or its representative)

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 14; Ga. L. 1957, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 5; Code 1933, § 34C-904, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-364.
Time of effectiveness of amendment; effect of amendment on pending causes of action.

If the Secretary of State issues a certificate of amendment, the amendment shall become effective as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the articles of amendment so certified; and the articles of incorporation shall be deemed to be amended accordingly.

No amendment shall affect any existing cause of action in favor of or against such electric membership corporation, or any pending action to which such electric membership corporation is a party, or the existing rights of persons other than members; and, in the event the corporate name is changed by amendment, no action brought by or against such electric membership corporation under its former name shall abate for that reason.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-905, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-365.
Restated articles of incorporation.

An electric membership corporation may at any time restate its articles of incorporation as theretofore amended.

If the restated articles restate the text of the original articles as theretofore amended, without making any further amendment or change, the restated articles may be adopted by the board of directors without a vote of the members. In the alternative, the board may submit the proposed restated articles to the members for approval in accordance with Code Section 46-3-361 relating to amendments of the articles of incorporation.

Any amendment or amendments to the articles of incorporation may be adopted in the form of restated articles of incorporation. In such case the restated articles shall be submitted to the members for approval in accordance with Code Section 46-3-361 relating to amendments of the articles of incorporation.

Upon adoption or approval of the proposed restated articles by the directors or the members, as the case may be, restated articles of incorporation shall be executed by the corporation as provided in Code Section 46-3-173, and shall set forth:

All provisions required by Code Section 46-3-321 to be included in original articles of incorporation at the time of restatement, except for the omissions expressly permitted by subsection (e) of this Code section;

If the restated articles of incorporation restate the text of the original articles of incorporation as theretofore amended without making any further amendment or change, that the restatement purports merely to restate but not to change the original articles of incorporation as theretofore amended and that there is no discrepancy, other than that expressly permitted by subsection (e) of this Code section, between the provisions of the original articles of incorporation and the provisions of the restated articles;

If any amendment or amendments to the articles of incorporation are adopted in the form of restated articles of incorporation, that the restatement purports merely to restate all those provisions then in effect not being amended by such new amendment or amendments;

The date upon which the restatement was authorized by the directors or the members, as the case may be;

If the restatement was authorized by the directors without a vote of the members, the director vote required to adopt the restatement and the number of directors who voted for the restatement;

If the restatement was authorized by the members, the member vote required to adopt the restatement, the number of members entitled to vote, and the number of members who voted for the restatement; and

That the restated articles supersede the original articles of incorporation as theretofore amended.

Restated articles of incorporation need not include statements as to the incorporator, the initial board of directors, the address of the initial registered office, or the name of the initial registered agent.

The electric membership corporation shall cause the original restated articles of incorporation and two conformed copies of the restated articles to be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing as provided in subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174.

Together with restated articles of incorporation, the electric membership corporation shall cause to be delivered to the Secretary of State:

If subsection (c) of this Code section is applicable and if the purpose of the amendment or of one of the amendments to the articles of incorporation is to change the corporate name, the certificate issued by the Secretary of State reserving the proposed corporate name;

Payment to the Secretary of State of the fee provided for in Code Section 46-3-501;

If subsection (c) of this Code section is applicable, a letter containing a notice for legal publication substantially in the form provided in paragraph (4) of subsection (c) of Code Section 46-3-363 and a check, draft, or money order in the amount of $60.00 payable to the designated newspaper; and

A check, draft, or money order in the amount of $16.00, payable to the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located on the day of delivery of the restated articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State, in payment of the cost of filing the restated articles of incorporation in that county.

Upon delivery of the restated articles of incorporation to the Secretary of State, the Secretary of State shall affix thereon the hour, day, month, and year of delivery. Not later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery, the Secretary of State shall either issue a restated certificate of incorporation in the manner provided in this Code section or reject the restated articles in the manner provided in this Code section.

If the Secretary of State finds that the restated articles of incorporation appear to be in proper form for filing and are accompanied by the other items required by subsection (g) of this Code section, he shall, in addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of Code Section 46-3-174:

Issue a restated certificate of incorporation which shall state that the articles of incorporation, as theretofore amended, have been restated and, where subsection (c) of this Code section is applicable, have been amended by the filing of restated articles of incorporation in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees paid therefor, as provided by law, and attach the certificate to one conformed copy of the restated articles of incorporation;

Return the restated certificate of incorporation with the conformed copy of the restated articles of incorporation attached thereto to the electric membership corporation or its representative. A copy of the restated certificate of incorporation shall be attached to the original restated articles of incorporation;

Forward a conformed copy of the restated articles of incorporation with a copy of the restated certificate of incorporation attached thereto, along with the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (4) of subsection (g) of this Code section, to the clerk of the superior court in the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located, within four business days after the restated articles of incorporation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; and

If subsection (c) of this Code section is applicable, mail the letter and the check, draft, or money order provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of this Code section, with the appropriate date inserted in the notice, to the designated newspaper within four business days after the restated articles of incorporation have been delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

If the Secretary of State finds that the restated articles of the electric membership corporation do not appear to be in proper form for filing or are not accompanied by the other items required by subsection (g) of this Code section, he shall reject the articles for filing and shall immediately notify the electric membership corporation or its representative of such rejection by mailing a notice no later than the close of business on the first business day following the day of delivery of the restated articles of incorporation for filing. Such notice shall specify the reason or reasons for rejection of the restated articles; and all accompanying materials shall be returned therewith.

The conformed copy of the restated articles of incorporation, with a copy of the restated certificate of incorporation attached thereto, as provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (i) of this Code section, shall be filed upon receipt by the clerk of the superior court of the county where the registered office of the electric membership corporation is located. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the conformed copy of the restated articles of incorporation or failure on the part of the clerk of the superior court to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the restated certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State.

The notice provided for in paragraph (3) of subsection (g) of this Code section shall be published within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper. Failure on the part of the Secretary of State to mail the notice or failure on the part of the newspaper to comply with this subsection shall not invalidate the issuance of the restated certificate of incorporation by the Secretary of State.

If the Secretary of State issued a restated certificate of incorporation, the restated articles of incorporation shall become effective as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the restated articles so certified; and the restated articles shall supersede the original articles of incorporation as theretofore amended.

When a restatement has been effected without a vote of the members, as permitted by subsection (b) of this Code section, that fact shall be disclosed in the next report furnished by the electric membership corporation to all its members and in any event to all of its members within 12 months of the effective date of such restatement.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 14; Ga. L. 1957, p. 604, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 5; Code 1933, § 34C-906, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.